North Dakota statutes. TITLE 30.1 Uniform Probate Code
CHAPTER 30.1-32 Trust Registration [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27]

30.1-32-01. (7-101)
Duty to register trusts. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

30.1-32-02. (7-102)
Registration procedures — Fee. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

30.1-32-03. (7-103)
Effect of registration. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

Note.

S.L. 2007, ch. 549, section 9 purported to amend this section but section 27 of the same act repealed chapter 30.1-32 in its entirety and the amendment to this section is therefore ineffective.

30.1-32-04. (7-104)
Effect of failure to register. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

30.1-32-05. (7-105)
Registration, qualification of foreign trustee. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.